Arkansas, session 2025, SB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Administrative Office of the Courts for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q004N AOC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE EXE04
(2) Q008N AOC DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE EXE03
(3) Q260C AOC COURT APPLICATIONS BUSINESS DIR 1 GRADE IST12
(4) D143C AOC JUDICIAL CHIEF IT SECURITY ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IST11
(5) Q088C AOC COMPUTER SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE IST09
(6) Q219C AOC DATA QUALITY MANAGER 2 GRADE IST09
*JAR037*
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
(7) Q048C AOC SOFTWARE ENGINEER 2 GRADE IST06
(8) Q114C AOC COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST II 2 GRADE IST05
(9) Q014C AOC SPECIALTY COURT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS12
(10) Q058C AOC JUDICIAL BRANCH EDUCATION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SGS12
(11) Q050C AOC COURT INTERPRETER SERVICES DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SGS11
(12) Q071C AOC FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE SGS11
(13) Q104C AOC PERSONNEL MANAGER 2 GRADE SGS10
(14) Q082C AOC INTERPRETER SC:L 1 GRADE SGS10
(15) Q069C AOC CASA COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS10
(16) G309C AOC GRANTS MANAGER 1 GRADE SGS10
(17) Q258C AOC JUVENILE JUSTICE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS10
(18) Q089C AOC OFFICE MANAGER 1 GRADE SGS10
(19) Q057C AOC PUBLIC INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE SGS10
(20) Q081C AOC SPANISH INTERPRETER 4 GRADE SGS10
(21) Q070C AOC REGIONAL FUNCTIONAL SPECIALIST 6 GRADE SGS09
(22) Q289C AOC DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS08
(23) Q113C AOC EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 5 GRADE SGS08
(24) Q102C AOC JUDICIAL EDUCATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS08
(25) A142C AOC PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE SGS08
(26) Q105C AOC RESEARCH ANALYST 1 GRADE SGS08
(27) Q009C AOC MANAGING ATTORNEY 2 GRADE SPC10
(28) Q019C AOC SENIOR STAFF ATTORNEY 3 GRADE SPC06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 47

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Administrative Office of the Courts - Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: two (2) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from the State
Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
Administrative Office of the Courts - Operations for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,873,747
(02) EXTRA HELP 5,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,260,512
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 619,627
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 35,000
(C) PROF. FEES 45,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 164,500
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) JUDICIAL EDUCATION 400,000
(06) COURT INTERPRETER FEES 519,350
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,922,736

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - DISPUTE RESOLUTION COMMISSION. There is
hereby established for the Administrative Office of the Courts - Dispute
Resolution Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q020C AOC ADR PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS12
(2) Q132C AOC ADR TRAINING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SGS08
(3) Q113C AOC EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 1 GRADE SGS08
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 3

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - DISPUTE RESOLUTION COMMISSION - STATE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to
be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services,
operating expenses and grants of the Administrative Office of the Courts -
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
Dispute Resolution Commission - State for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $223,578
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 75,116
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 35,514
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,000
(C) PROF. FEES 31,604
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION GRANTS 25,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $405,812

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION COMMISSION -
CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the
Courts, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses,
fees and services of the Administrative Office of the Courts - Alternative
Dispute Resolution Commission - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $125,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 30,000
(C) PROF. FEES 120,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $275,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - HEARING & VISUAL IMPAIRMENTS - STATE. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for operating expenses for
reasonable accommodations for persons with hearing and visual impairments to
act as a venire person or juror for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AUXILIARY AIDS-HEARING & VISUAL
IMPAIRMENTS $10,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - DISTRICT JUDGES CONTINUING EDUCATION -
STATE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the
Courts, to be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for operating
expenses for a continuing education program for District Judges for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $60,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $80,000

SECTION 9. REGULAR SALARIES - DIVISION OF DEPENDENCY-NEGLECT
REPRESENTATION. There is hereby established for the Administrative Office of
the Courts - Division of Dependency-Neglect Representation for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q191C AOC DATA ANALYST 1 GRADE IST06
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
(2) Q019C AOC SENIOR STAFF ATTORNEY 2 GRADE SPC06
(3) Q029C AOC AD LITEM ATTORNEY 34 GRADE SPC05
(4) Q113C AOC EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 1 GRADE SGS08
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 38

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - DIVISION OF DEPENDENCY-NEGLECT
REPRESENTATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office
of the Courts, to be transferred from the State Administration of Justice
Fund, and to be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Administrative Office of the Courts -
Division of Dependency-Neglect Representation for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,307,962
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,060,799
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 566,514
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 1,405,816
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) LOCAL CASA PROGRAM GRANTS 1,750,000
(05) ATTORNEY AD LITEM FEES/REIMBURSEMENTS 396,750
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,497,841

SECTION 11. REGULAR SALARIES - COURT AUTOMATION. There is hereby
established for the Administrative Office of the Courts - Court Automation
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
(1) Q012N AOC CIS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE IST15
(2) Q015N AOC APPLICATIONS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE IST12
(3) Q261C AOC IT PROJECT MANAGEMENT OFFICE DIR 1 GRADE IST12
(4) Q062N AOC SYSTEMS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE IST12
(5) N187N CIS DIVISION ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE IST12
(6) Q259C AOC JUDICIAL CHIEF IT SECURITY OFFICER 1 GRADE IST11
(7) Q005C AOC DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE IST11
(8) Q140C AOC DEVELOPMENT TEAM MANAGER 1 GRADE IST10
(9) Q028C AOC TECHNICAL TEAM MANAGER 1 GRADE IST10
(10) Q136C AOC INFORMATION SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE IST09
(11) Q016C AOC PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE IST09
(12) Q190C AOC PROJECT MANAGER II 3 GRADE IST07
(13) Q138C AOC QUALITY ASSURANCE LEAD 1 GRADE IST07
(14) Q139C AOC IT SECURITY ANALYST 1 GRADE IST06
(15) Q142C AOC SOFTWARE ENGINEER 4 GRADE IST06
(16) Q049C AOC TECHNICAL ANALYST 3 GRADE IST06
(17) Q101C AOC WEBSITE DEVELOPER 1 GRADE IST06
(18) Q135C AOC BUSINESS ANALYST 4 GRADE IST06
(19) Q191C AOC DATA ANALYST 1 GRADE IST06
(20) Q189C AOC PROJECT ANALYST 2 GRADE IST06
(21) Q137C AOC QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IST06
(22) Q300C AOC QUALITY ENGINEER 1 GRADE IST06
(23) Q068C AOC APPLICATIONS SPECIALIST 8 GRADE IST05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 43

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - COURT AUTOMATION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund, for personal services,
operating expenses and other costs associated with the state court automation
system by the Administrative Office of the Courts - Court Automation for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,598,673
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,167,176
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,450,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 801,590
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,092,439

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - COURT AUTOMATION - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses and other costs
associated with the state court automation system of the Administrative
Office of the Courts - Court Automation - Cash for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $150,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $150,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - DISTRICT JUDGES & CLERKS CONTINUING
EDUCATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the
Courts, to be payable from the District Court Judge and District Court Clerk
Education Fund, for operating expenses for the purpose of providing
continuing education to District Court Judges and District Courts Clerks by
the Administrative Office of the Courts - District Court Judges & Clerks
Continuing Education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $100,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 10,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $120,000

SECTION 15. REGULAR SALARIES - COURT IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM - FEDERAL.
There is hereby established for the Administrative Office of the Courts -
Court Improvement - Federal for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q056C AOC CIP PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE SGS10
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - COURT IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM - FEDERAL. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services, operating expenses and grants of the
Administrative Office of the Courts - Court Improvement Program - Federal for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $67,947
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 23,527
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 350,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 150,000
(C) PROF. FEES 30,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) DEPENDENCY NEGLECT GRANTS 140,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $761,474

SECTION 17. REGULAR SALARIES - ACCESS & VISITATION MEDIATION - FEDERAL.
There is hereby established for the Administrative Office of the Courts
Access & Visitation Mediation - Federal for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q121C AOC DIRECTOR ACCESS & VISITATION 1 GRADE SGS07
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - ACCESS & VISITATION MEDIATION - FEDERAL.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to
be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Administrative Office of the Courts - Access & Visitation Mediation - Federal
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $43,010
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 17,933
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 10,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 85,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $155,943

SECTION 19. REGULAR SALARIES - COURT SECURITY GRANTS. There is hereby
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
established for the Administrative Office of the Courts - Court Security
Grants for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Q133C AOC DIR OF SEC & EMER PREPAREDNESS 1 GRADE LES09
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - COURT SECURITY GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for personal services, operating expenses
and security grants of the Administrative Office of the Courts - Court
Security Grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $97,565
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 30,331
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,000
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) SECURITY GRANTS 500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $660,896

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - COUNTY JUROR REIMBURSEMENT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be
payable from the County Juror Reimbursement Fund, for reimbursing Arkansas
counties for the costs of jurors by the Administrative Office of the Courts -
County Juror Reimbursement for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COUNTY JUROR REIMBURSEMENTS $850,000

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - COURT MANAGEMENT PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Administrative
Office of the Courts - Court Management Program for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,000

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - USDOT CASE MANAGEMENT. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses for the US Department of Transportation Case Management
Program of the Administrative Office of the Courts - USDOT Case Management
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $484,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $484,000

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - COURT INTERPRETERS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses associated with fees from
Court Interpreter candidates and interpreter fees ordered by judges for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $10,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 15,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,000

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - SPECIALTY COURT PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the Specialty Court Program Fund, for costs associated with the Specialty
Court Program and providing assistance and support to the Specialty Court
Advisory Committee for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SPECIALTY COURT PROGRAM $300,000

SECTION 26. APPROPRIATION - CASA PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates Program Fund, for operating
expenses and grants to local CASA programs statewide of the Administrative
Office of the Courts - CASA Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CASA PROGRAM EXPENSES $10,000

SECTION 27. APPROPRIATION - DRUG COURT ENHANCEMENT. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the Administrative Office of the Courts - Drug Court
Enhancement for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $2,021,851
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 964,359
(C) PROF. FEES 3,677,807
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) GRANTS AND AID 2,498,223
(03) ADULT TREATMENT COURT PROGRAM 28,640
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $9,190,880

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - AOC STATEWIDE SOFTWARE LICENSE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for costs associated with software
licensing for district and circuit courts of the Administrative Office of the
Courts - Statewide Software License for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $30,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $30,000

SECTION 29. APPROPRIATION - JUVENILE JUSTICE REFORM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses associated with Juvenile Justice Racial and Ethnic
Disparities Reform Initiative of the Administrative Office of the Courts -
Juvenile Justice Reform for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $353,774
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 13,914
(C) PROF. FEES 632,312
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,000,000

SECTION 30. APPROPRIATION - ACCOUNTABILITY COURT FUND. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the Accountability Court Fund, for operating expenses and grants and aid of
the Administrative Office of the Courts - Accountability Court Fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ACCOUNTABILITY COURT EXPENSES $400,000

SECTION 31. APPROPRIATION - ADULT DRUG COURT. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses and grants and aid of the
Administrative Office of the Courts - Adult Drug Court Program for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ADULT DRUG COURT EXPENSES $1,000,000

SECTION 32. APPROPRIATION - SPECIALTY COURTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for operating expenses and grants for
specialty courts of the Administrative Office of the Courts for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 2,800,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) GRANTS AND AID 1,700,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,500,000

SECTION 33. APPROPRIATION - COURTHOUSE LACTATION FACILITIES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses and grants for
the construction, maintenance, renovation, equipping or purchase of lactation
facilities for Arkansas Courthouses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COURTHOUSE LACTATION FACILITIES $100,000
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72

SECTION 34. APPROPRIATION - BYRNE JAG GRANT. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
grants and aid to improve collaborative efforts with behavioral health and
criminal justice stakeholders for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS AND AID $150,000

SECTION 35. APPROPRIATION - COURT TECHNOLOGY INITATIVE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Administrative Office of the Courts, to be
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for operating expenses for advancing the case management system in
Arkansas for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 4,027,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,027,500

SECTION 36. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
TRANSFER. Federal funds received by the Arkansas State Police from the
United States Department of Transportation from safety incentive funds
received under 23 USC Section 402 for the "State and Community Highway Safety
Program" may be granted to the Administrative Office of the Courts and
deposited into the State Central Services Fund to reimburse expenditures by
the Administrative Office of the Courts for operating expenses of the
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
Continuing Education Program for District Judges as appropriated in the
District Judges Continuing Education - State appropriation herein. The
appropriation to the Administrative Office of the Courts provided in the
District Judges Continuing Education - State appropriation may be expended
only in the event that federal funds have been granted and will be
transferred from the Arkansas State Police to reimburse the Continuing
Education Program for District Judges.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 37. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DEPENDENCY-NEGLECT REPRESENTATION APPROPRIATION TRANSFER AUTHORITY. The
Administrative Office of the Courts shall receive approval from the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State and Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee to transfer funds and appropriations between line items Regular
Salaries, Personal Services Matching, Operating Expense, Professional Fees
and Attorney Ad Litem Fees/Reimbursements of the Division of Dependency-
Neglect Representation appropriation herein for the payment of employees
and/or contractors providing legal services for the Division of Dependency-
Neglect Representation.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Administrative Office of the Courts may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Administrative Office of
the Courts authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is
both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight
by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this
section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 38. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
MONTHLY INSTALLMENT. From July 1, 2024 2025 through June 20, 2025 2026, a
lump sum monthly installment of at least one-twelfth (1/12) of a portion of
the annual appropriation provided for in the Division of Dependency-Neglect
Representation appropriation of this Act, or so much thereof as may be made
available, shall be provided from the State Administration of Justice Fund to
the State Central Services Fund to provide a portion of the funds for that
appropriation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 39. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. After receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State and Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, the
Agency is authorized to transfer appropriation from any line item authorized
in Court Automation Appropriation of the Administrative Office of the Courts
in this Act to any other line item authorized in Court Automation
Appropriation.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Administrative Office of the Courts may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Administrative Office of
the Courts authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both
necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by
requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section.
If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction,
this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 40. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUNDING
AND APPROPRIATION TRANSFER AUTHORITY FOR COUNTY JUROR REIMBURSEMENT. (i)
After receiving prior approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee if meeting in a Legislative Session, the Director of the
Administrative Office of the Courts may direct the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State to transfer appropriation to the County Juror Reimbursement
appropriation and State Central Services funding in the same amount to the
County Juror Reimbursement Fund from any State Central Services Fund
appropriation authorized for the Administrative Office of the Courts.
(ii) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and funding for a state
agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is
usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s)
for a state agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each
fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law.
Further, the General Assembly has determined that the Administrative Office
of the Courts may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to
the Administrative Office of the Courts authorizing broad powers under this
Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee, if meeting in a Legislative Session, as
provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section.
If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction,
this entire section is void.
(iii) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB72
SECTION 41. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 42. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 43. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee




04-07-2025 17:31:37 JAR037